District of Columbia statutes.
29-405.25

Action by single and multiple voting groups.

(a)

If this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws provide for voting by a single voting group on a matter, action on that matter is taken when voted upon by that voting group as provided in § 29-405.24.

(b)

If this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws provide for voting by 2 or more voting groups on a matter, action on that matter shall be taken only when voted upon by each of those voting groups counted separately as provided in § 29-405.24.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720